Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
155

AGRICULTURAL
LOANS

Section

155-1 Definitions

155-2 Objectives

155-3 Restriction

155-4 Powers and duties of the department

155-5 Loans insured by the department

155-5.5 Loans guaranteed by the department

155-5.6 Loan guaranty; important agricultural
lands;

agricultural and aquacultural loans

155-6 Participation in loans by the department

155-6.5 Cooperation in loans by the department

155-7 Repealed

155-8 Direct loans

155-9 Classes of loans; purposes, terms,
eligibility

155-10 General eligibility requirements for loans

155-11 Security for loans; mortgages

155-12 Conditions

155-13 Repayment; refinancing

155-14 Funds; application of payments

155-15 Repealed

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1977, c 22, §1.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next